Oklahoma, session 2025, SB457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Diesel Engine Freedom Act”.


B. The Legislature finds and declares that:


1. Article I, Section 8, Clause 3 of the United States


Constitution grants the United States Congress power to regulate


commerce “among the several states”, not intrastate commerce or


activities solely within one state;

Req. No. 1300 Page 1


2. The federal government’s mandate requiring the use of diesel


exhaust fluid in diesel engines operating within this state exceeds


the powers delegated to Congress under Article I, Section 8, and are


therefore unconstitutional;


3. Under the 10th Amendment to the United States Constitution,


powers not delegated to the federal government nor prohibited to the


states are reserved to the states or to the people, granting this


state the authority to regulate emissions standards for vehicles


used within its borders; and


4. It is the duty of this state to protect its citizens from


unconstitutional overreach and burdensome regulations that are


outside the bounds of federal authority.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 12-429 of Title 47, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Pursuant to the 10th Amendment of the United States


Constitution, this state asserts its sovereign right to regulate


emissions standards for vehicles operating within its borders when


such vehicles are not engaged in interstate commerce.


B. This state declares that any federal regulation, executive


order, or mandate requiring the use of diesel exhaust fluid in


diesel engines operating solely within this state is null and void,


as it exceeds the constitutional authority granted to the United



Req. No. 1300 Page 2


States Congress under Article I, Section 8 of the United States


Constitution.


C. No state agency, political subdivision, or officer of this


state shall enforce or attempt to enforce any federal law,


regulation, or executive order requiring the use of diesel exhaust


fluid for vehicles operating within this state.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 12-430 of Title 47, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. The manufacture, sale, and installation of diesel


engines and equipment that do not require diesel exhaust fluid shall


be fully lawful within this state.


2. No state agency, political subdivision, or officer of this


state shall prohibit or restrict the production, sale, or use of


non-diesel exhaust fluid engines within this state.


B. 1. Non-diesel exhaust fluid engines manufactured and sold


exclusively within this state are declared exempt from federal


emissions standards, pursuant to this state’s authority over


intrastate commerce provided by the 10th Amendment to the United


States Constitution.


2. Such engines shall be clearly labeled for use within this


state and may not be exported for use in other states unless


compliant with applicable federal laws.



Req. No. 1300 Page 3


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 12-431 of Title 47, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Any state agency, political subdivision, or individual found to


be enforcing or attempting to enforce any federal diesel exhaust


fluid mandate within this state shall be subject to the following:


1. A civil fine up to Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per


violation;


2. An immediate suspension of the authority to enforce state


laws or regulations related to vehicle emissions for a period no


less than twelve (12) months; and


3. For state officers or employees, termination of employment


and a prohibition on holding public office or state employment for a


period of five (5) years.


SECTION 5. REPEALER 47 O.S. 2021, Section 12-423, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1300 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:36:45 AM





Req. No. 1300 Page 4